Utah statutes.
41-22-16.   Authorized peace officers -- Arrest provisions.
(1)  Any peace officer authorized under Title 53, Chapter 13, Peace Officer
Classifications, may enforce the provisions of this chapter and the rules
promulgated under this chapter.
(2)  Whenever any person is arrested for any violation of the provisions of
this chapter or of the rules promulgated under this chapter, the procedure for
the arrest is the same as outlined in Sections 77-7-22, 77-7-23, and 77-7-24.
